Rhode Island statutes. Title 15 Domestic Relations
Article 1 Definitions, Scope and General Provisions

15-8.1-101.
Short title.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the “Rhode Island Uniform Parentage Act.”

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-102.
Definitions.

As used in this chapter:

“Acknowledged parent” means an individual who has established a parent-child relationship pursuant to article 3 of this chapter.

“Adjudicated parent” means an individual who has been adjudicated by a court of competent jurisdiction to be a parent of a child.

“Alleged genetic parent” means an individual who is alleged to be, or alleges that the individual is, a genetic parent or possible genetic parent of a child whose parentage has not been adjudicated. The term includes an alleged genetic father and alleged genetic mother. The term does not include:

A presumed parent;

A person whose parental rights have been terminated or declared not to exist; or

A donor.

“Assisted reproduction” means a method of causing pregnancy other than through sexual intercourse and includes, but is not limited to:

Intrauterine, intracervical, or vaginal insemination;

Donation of gametes;

Donation of embryos;

In vitro fertilization and transfer of embryos; and

Intracytoplasmic sperm injection.

“Birth” includes stillbirth and fetal death.

“Birth order” means those orders declaring parentage of a child, which may be obtained from a court of competent jurisdiction before or after birth of a child.

“Child” means an individual of any age whose parentage may be determined pursuant to this chapter.

“Determination of parentage” means establishment of a parent-child relationship by a judicial or administrative proceeding or signing of a valid acknowledgement of parentage pursuant to article 3 of this chapter.

“Domestic assault” shall include any offense as set forth in §

12-29-2

.

“Donor” means an individual who contributes a gamete or gametes or an embryo or embryos to another individual intended for assisted reproduction or gestation, whether or not for consideration. This term does not include:

An individual who gives birth to a child conceived by assisted reproduction except as otherwise provided in article 8 of this chapter; or

A parent pursuant to article 7 of this chapter or an intended parent pursuant to article 8 of this chapter.

“Embryo” means a cell or group of cells containing a diploid complement of chromosomes or a group of such cells, not including a gamete, that has the potential to develop into a live born human being if transferred into the body of a person under conditions in which gestation may be reasonably expected to occur.

“Gamete” means sperm, egg, or any part of a sperm or egg.

“Gestational carrier” means an adult individual who is not an intended parent and who enters into a gestational carrier agreement to bear a child conceived using the gametes of another individual and not the gestational carrier’s own, except that an individual who carries a child for a family member using the gestational carrier’s own gametes and who fulfills the requirements of article 8 of this chapter is a gestational carrier.

“Gestational carrier agreement” means a contract between an intended parent or parents and a gestational carrier intended to result in a live birth.

“Intended parent” means an individual, whether married or unmarried, who manifests an intent to be legally bound as a parent of a child conceived through assisted reproduction or a gestational carrier agreement.

“Marriage” means and includes civil union and any legal relationship that provides substantially the same rights, benefits, and responsibilities as marriage and is recognized as valid in the state or jurisdiction in which it was entered.

“Parent” means an individual who has established parentage that meets the requirements of this chapter.

“Parentage” means the legal relationship between a child and a parent as established under this chapter.

“Presumed parent” means a person who is presumed to be the parent of a child under §

15-8.1-401

, unless the presumption is overcome in a judicial proceeding, a valid denial of parentage is made under article 3 of this chapter, or a court adjudicates the individual to be a parent.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Sexual assault” shall include sexual assault as provided in §

11-37-2

, child molestation as provided in §§

11-37-8.1

and

11-37-8.3

, and indecent solicitation of a minor as provided in §

11-37-8.8

, and similar offenses in other jurisdictions.

“Sexual exploitation” shall include sexual exploitation of a minor as provided in §

11-9-1

, sexual abuse of a vulnerable adult as provided in chapter 37 of title 11, and similar offenses in other jurisdictions.

“Sign” means, with the intent to authenticate or adopt a record, to:

Execute or adopt a tangible symbol; or

Attach to or logically associate with the record an electronic symbol, sound, or process.

“Signatory” means an individual who signs a record.

“Spouse” includes a partner in a civil union or a partner in a legal relationship that provides substantially the same rights, benefits, and responsibilities as marriage and is recognized as valid in the state or jurisdiction in which it was entered.

“Transfer” means a procedure for assisted reproduction by which an embryo or sperm is placed in the body of the individual who will give birth to the child.

“Witnessed” means that at least one individual is authorized to sign and has signed a record to verify that the individual personally observed a signatory sign the record.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-103.
Scope and application.

This chapter applies to an adjudication and determination of parentage in the state of Rhode Island.

The court shall apply the law of the state of Rhode Island to adjudicate parentage.

This chapter does not create, enlarge, or diminish parental rights or responsibilities under other laws of the state of Rhode Island or the equitable powers of the courts, except as provided in this chapter.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-104.
Parentage proceeding.

A proceeding to adjudicate the parentage of a child shall be maintained in accordance with this chapter and with the family court rules of domestic relations procedure and/or the rules of juvenile proceedings, except that proceedings for orders of parentage, pursuant to §

15-8.1-804

, may be maintained in accordance with the superior court rules of civil procedure.

If a complaint is brought by the office of child support services, the complaint shall be accompanied by an affidavit of the parent whose rights have been assigned. In cases where the assignor is not a genetic parent or is a genetic parent who refuses to provide an affidavit, the affidavit may be submitted by the office of child support services, but the affidavit alone shall not support a default judgment on the issue of parentage.

Original actions to adjudicate parentage may be commenced in the family court, except that proceedings for orders of parentage under §

15-8.1-804

, may be commenced in either the family court or the superior court.

There shall be no right to a jury trial in an action to determine parentage.

An individual who is a party to a parentage action shall disclose that individual’s social security number to the court. The social security number of an individual subject to a parentage adjudication shall be placed in the court records relating to the adjudication. The court shall disclose an individual’s social security number to the office of child support.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-105.
Standing to maintain proceeding.

Subject to other provisions of this chapter, a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may be maintained by:

The child;

The individual who gave birth to the child unless a court has adjudicated that the individual is not a parent or the individual is a gestational carrier who is not a parent under article 8 of this chapter;

An individual whose parentage is to be adjudicated;

An individual who is a parent under this chapter;

The office of child support services; or

A representative authorized by law to act for an individual who would otherwise be entitled to maintain a proceeding but who is deceased, incapacitated, or a minor.

A foster parent does not have standing under this chapter to establish parentage based solely on their status as a foster parent.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-106.
Notice of proceeding.

Except as provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this section, an individual filing a proceeding to adjudicate parentage pursuant to this chapter shall give notice of the proceeding to adjudicate parentage to the following:

The individual who gave birth to the child unless a court has adjudicated that the individual is not a parent;

An individual who is a parent of the child under this chapter;

A presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent of the child;

A person whose parentage of the child is to be adjudicated; and

The office of child support services, in cases in which either party is a recipient of public assistance benefits from the department of human services and has assigned the right to child support, or in cases in which either party has requested the services of the office of child support services.

An individual entitled to notice under subsection (a) of this section and the office of child support services, where the office is involved pursuant to subsection (a)(5) of this section, has a right to intervene in the proceeding.

Lack of notice required under subsection (a) of this section shall not render a judgment void. Lack of notice shall not preclude an individual entitled to notice under subsection (a) of this section from bringing a proceeding pursuant to this chapter.

Notice of complaints for orders of parentage under §

15-8.1-804

shall be as required in §

15-8.1-804

.

Donors, as defined in §

15-8.1-102

, are not entitled to notice.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-107.
Personal jurisdiction.

An individual shall not be adjudicated a parent unless the court has personal jurisdiction over the individual.

A court having jurisdiction to adjudicate parentage may exercise personal jurisdiction over a nonresident individual, or the guardian or conservator of the individual, if the conditions prescribed for actions regarding interstate child support, pursuant to §

15-23.1-201

of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act, are fulfilled.

Lack of jurisdiction over one person does not preclude the court from making an adjudication of parentage binding on another individual over whom the court has personal jurisdiction.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-108.
Venue.

Venue for a proceeding to adjudicate parentage shall be in the county in which:

The child resides or is present or, for purposes of article 7 or 8 of this chapter, is or will be born;

Any parent or intended parent resides;

The respondent resides or is present if the child does not reside in this state;

A proceeding for probate or administration of the parent or alleged parent’s estate has been commenced; or

A child protection proceeding with respect to the child has been commenced.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-109.
Joinder of proceedings.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may be joined with a proceeding for parental rights and responsibilities, parent-child contact, child support, child protection, termination of parental rights, divorce, annulment, legal separation, guardianship, probate or administration of an estate or other appropriate proceeding, or a challenge or rescission of acknowledgment of parentage. Such proceedings shall be in the family court.

A respondent may not join a proceeding set forth in subsection (a) of this section with a proceeding to adjudicate parentage brought as part of an interstate child support enforcement action under §

15-23.1-201

of the Uniform Interstate Family Support Act.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-110.
Orders.

In a proceeding under this chapter, the court may issue an interim order for support of a child in accordance with the child support guidelines under §

15-5-16.2

and as established by the family court with respect to an individual who is:

A presumed, acknowledged, or adjudicated parent of the child;

Petitioning to have parentage adjudicated;

Identified as the genetic parent through genetic testing under article 6 of this chapter;

An alleged genetic parent who has declined to submit to genetic testing;

Shown by a preponderance of evidence to be a parent of the child;

The individual who gave birth to the child, other than a gestational carrier; or

A parent under this chapter.

In a proceeding under this chapter, the court may make an interim order regarding parental rights and responsibilities on a temporary basis.

Final orders concerning child support or parent rights and responsibilities shall be governed by title 15.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-111.
Admission of parentage authorized.

A respondent in a proceeding to adjudicate parentage may admit parentage of a child when making an appearance or during a hearing in a proceeding involving the child or by filing a pleading to such effect. An admission of parentage pursuant to this section is different from an acknowledgment of parentage, as provided in article 3 of this chapter.

If the court finds an admission to be consistent with the provisions of this chapter and rejects any objection filed by another party, the court may issue an order adjudicating the child to be the child of the individual admitting parentage.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-112.
Order on default.

The court may issue an order adjudicating the parentage of an individual who is in default, provided that:

The individual was served with notice of the proceeding; and

The individual is found by the court to be the parent of the child based on a preponderance of the evidence.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-113.
Order adjudicating parentage.

In a proceeding under this chapter, the court shall issue a final order adjudicating whether a person alleged or claiming to be a parent is the parent of a child.

A final order under subsection (a) of this section, shall identify the child by name and date of birth.

On request of a party and for good cause shown, the court may order that the name of the child be changed.

If the final order under subsection (a) of this section, is at variance with the child’s birth certificate, the department of health, division of vital statistics, shall issue an amended birth certificate.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-114.
Binding effect of determination of parentage.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) of this section, a determination of parentage shall be binding on:

All signatories to an acknowledgment form of parentage or denial of parentage, as provided in article 3 of this chapter; and

All parties to an adjudication by a court acting under circumstances that satisfy the jurisdictional requirements of §

15-8.1-107

.

In a proceeding to dissolve a marriage, the court is deemed to have made an adjudication of the parentage of a child if:

The court acts under circumstances that satisfy the jurisdictional requirements of §

15-8.1-107

; and

The final order:

Expressly identified a child as a “child of the marriage” or “issue of the marriage” or by similar words indicates that the parties are the parents of the child; or

Provides for support of the child by the parent or parents.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, a determination of parentage shall be a defense in a subsequent proceeding seeking to adjudicate parentage by a person who was not a party to the earlier proceeding.

Appeal of adjudication.

A party to an adjudication of parentage or a party who received notice under §

15-8.1-106

, may challenge the adjudication only by appeal or in a manner otherwise consistent with the rules governing a collateral attack on a judgment.

An individual who has standing under §

15-8.1-105

, but who did not receive notice of the adjudication of parentage under §

15-8.1-106

, and was not a party to the adjudication, may challenge the adjudication within two (2) years after the effective date of the adjudication. The court, in its discretion, shall permit the proceeding only if it finds that it is in the best interests of the child. If the court permits the proceeding, the court shall adjudicate parentage under §

15-8.1-206

.

An appeal of an acknowledgment by a nonsignatory shall be provided in article 3 of this chapter.

A child shall not be bound by a determination of parentage under this chapter unless:

The determination was based on an unrescinded acknowledgment of parentage and the acknowledgment is consistent with the results of genetic testing;

The determination was based on a finding consistent with the results of genetic testing;

The determination of parentage was made under article 7 or 8 of this chapter; or

The child was a party or was represented by an attorney, guardian ad litem, or similar individual in the proceeding in which the child’s parentage was adjudicated.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.

15-8.1-115.
Full faith and credit.

This state shall give full faith and credit to a determination of parentage and to an acknowledgment of parentage from another state if the determination or acknowledgment is valid and effective in accordance with the law of the other state.

History of Section.

P.L. 2020, ch. 59, § 2; P.L. 2020, ch. 60, § 2.